fts/tsearch_data/russian.dict
Аляска/H
Артемида/H
Братислава/H
Валя/I
Веста/H
Гватемала/H
Двина/H
Зоя/I
Индия/H
Караганда/H
Ксюха/H
Луара/H
Машка/H
Назаровна/I
Ниагара/H
Персия/H
Сардиния/H
Сунжа/H
Тамара/I
Федька/H
Швеция/H
Яхрома/H
авиашкола/I
автокоррекция/H
агрикультура/H
азогруппа/I
акваметрия/H
актуальный/AES
аллергия/H
аминокислота/I
анестезированный/AS
анимация/H
апория/H
арийка/I
архаизация/H
аутоинфекция/H
аффектированный/ASX
бабочка/I
банальщина/H
барокамера/I
бархатистый/AES
безвинный/AX
безграмотный/AES
беззаконный/AX
безнадёжный/AES
безотрадный/AS
безумный/AES
безыскусственный/AX
белоруска/I
бескорыстный/AES
беспредметный/AS
бессвязный/AES
бессмысленный/AEX
бесформенный/AEX
бижутерия/H
битва/I
благовоспитанный/AX
благополучный/AES
благородный/AES
блаженный/AEX
боговдохновенный/AX
болезненный/AEX
болячка/I
ботва/H
брезгливый/AES
брошюра/I
бурный/AS
бусинка/I
важный/AES
валеология/H
вдова/I
величавый/AES
верный/AES
весталка/I
вещественный/AX
вздвоённый/AS
видный/AES
вика/H
винтовочка/I
вкрапленный/AS
влиятельный/AES
возвещенный/AS
воздержанный/AX
вольнослушательница/I
вооружённый/ASX
воркотня/E
воспалённый/AS
врожденный/ASX
вскипячённый/AS
въедливый/AES
выбуренный/AS
вывалка/H
выгода/I
выкованный/AS
выплавленный/AS
высокогуманный/AX
высокопроизводительный/AS
высокоторжественный/AX
вычтенный/AS
газетёнка/I
гелиография/H
герметичный/AES
гетерия/I
гидравлика/H
гипертрофированный/ASX
гипотермия/H
головешка/I
головокружительный/AS
голосистый/AES
горчинка/H
градация/I
грамотный/AES
гряда/I
грязный/AES
давленный/AS
дворянка/I
дегидратация/H
декольтированный/ASX
демократичный/AES
демонстрантка/I
дератизация/H
дефективный/AS
диетология/H
диоптрия/I
доброжелательный/AES
доверенный/ASX
догматизированный/AS
доминанта/H
домовладелица/I
досадный/AES
досланный/AS
дружественный/AEX
дублерша/I
ектенья/I
жалованный/ASX
жалостный/AES
жароустойчивый/AS
живица/H
жизнеспособный/AES
жиличка/I
заваленный/AS
заграбастанный/AS
заданный/ASX
задачка/I
задиристый/AES
зазубренный/ASX
закаленный/ASX
закругленный/ASX
замедленный/ASX
заметочка/I
замотанный/AS
занимательный/AES
заплетённый/AS
запуганный/ASX
зарубленный/AS
заспанный/ASX
заструганный/AS
затрудненный/ASX
затуманенный/AS
затычка/I
заштукатуренный/AS
защищённый/AES
звезда/H
злорадный/AES
злючка/I
избегнутый/AS
избранница/I
изведанный/ASX
известный/AES
изможденный/AES
измученный/AESX
изнеженный/AESX
изощрённый/AESX
изрезанный/ASX
изъявленный/AS
иммунодиагностика/H
инвентарь/E
инверсированный/ASX
индианка/I
интернациональный/AS
интуиция/H
искривленный/AES
искусительница/I
испохабленный/AS
исступлённый/AEZ
истинный/AEX
калибровщица/I
кальцинированный/AS
камчатка/H
каракуля/I
катальня/I
категоричный/AES
кинетокардиография/H
кинопленка/I
кличка/I
кокцидия/I
колоритный/AES
кольпоскопия/H
коммуналка/I
компенсированный/AS
конструктивный/AES
конференция/I
концентрированный/ASX
копуляция/H
коровонька/I
кочерёжка/I
красочный/AES
кристаллография/H
кроссовка/I
кудрявый/AES
купюра/I
лабильный/AES
лапища/I
ларинготомия/H
ласкательный/AS
леска/I
линованный/ASX
лиходейка/I
лихорадочный/AES
личина/H
львинка/I
малоежка/I
малосущественный/AX
малышня/E
маммалиология/H
манерный/AS
маслобойня/I
мелитоза/H
менада/I
мертвенный/AX
мизантропия/H
микросистема/I
миндаль/E
мобильный/AES
мода/I
монадология/H
морковина/I
морщинистый/AES
моторизированный/ASX
мудрый/AES
музыкальный/AES
мучительница/I
надежный/AES
надушенный/AS
накатка/H
направленный/ASX
нареченный/AS
насмешливый/AES
насыщенный/AESX
нашатырь/E
небезнадежный/AS
невещественный/AX
невзгода/I
недлинный/AX
незадачливый/AS
незаинтересованный/AX
неизбежный/AES
нелакированный/AX
немчура/H
необоснованный/AX
неописуемый/AS
неоправданный/AX
неопределенный/AEZ
неполноценный/AX
непринужденный/AX
неразумный/AS
несвоевременный/AX
неспециализированный/AX
неудовлетворенный/AX
неумолимый/AES
нецивилизованный/AX
нечувствительный/AS
новоизданный/AX
нумеровка/H
ныряльщица/I
обездоленный/ASX
обжорливый/AS
обидный/AES
облечённый/ASX
обособленный/ASX
обрамлённый/AS
обтрёпанный/ASX
обшарпанный/AESX
огорчённый/ASX
одноименный/AX
одорология/H
оживленный/AESX
омоченный/AS
опасливый/AES
операционистка/I
оправданный/ASX
ортодонтия/H
оскальпированный/AS
осмотрительный/AES
осознанный/ASX
отесанный/AS
отменный/AX
оторочка/H
отполосканный/AS
отрешённый/AESX
отхлёстанный/AS
охранница/I
ощипанный/ASX
пампа/H
паспортизованный/AS
педицеллярия/I
пелена/H
перезаказанный/AS
переобученный/AS
пересортировка/H
переучтённый/AS
пескоструйщица/I
планисфера/H
планомерный/AES
плита/I
повежливее/E
повинный/AX
повседневный/AS
подлитый/AS
подробный/AES
подстановка/I
подсчитанный/AS
подтушевка/H
пожизненный/AX
покорный/AES
полузабытый/AS
помология/H
понахальнее/E
поношенный/ASX
попротивнее/E
порождённый/AS
портниха/I
посвободнее/E
поспокойнее/E
потрепанный/ASX
поухоженнее/E
правоспособный/AS
практичный/AES
презренный/ASX
прибинтованный/AS
привратница/I
приглушенный/AESX
прикосновенный/AX
приматология/H
примерный/AS
присуждённый/AS
приязненный/AX
прогнутый/AS
продуктивный/AES
промеренный/AS
пропорция/I
просветлённый/ASX
просуммированный/AS
протёска/H
пустынный/AEX
пушенка/H
пышный/AES
пятерка/I
радированный/AS
разговорчивый/AES
разгрузка/H
разлаженный/ASX
разлучённый/AS
разумный/AES
разъяренный/ASX
расистка/I
раскабаленный/AS
распылённый/ASX
расселенный/AS
расточка/H
растрёпанный/ASX
расшифрованный/AS
ревнивый/AES
рентгенограмма/I
рентгенометрия/H
рискованный/AEX
романтичный/AES
рулёжка/H
рыбка/I
самобытный/AES
самоуверенный/AEX
сатисфакция/H
свиноматка/I
своевременный/AX
сговорчивый/AES
секвестрованный/AS
семилетка/H
сильфида/I
синьора/H
скверный/AES
склонный/AX
скоропалительный/AS
словачка/I
смелый/AES
сморённый/AS
сморщенный/ASX
снегоочистка/H
согбенный/AX
содержательный/AES
сокрушённый/ASX
соскребенный/AS
сотрапезница/I
спаянный/ASX
способный/AES
стандартизованный/AS
старичина/H
стерва/I
стилизованный/ASX
стряпня/E
суматоха/H
суша/I
схапанный/AS
телеобработка/H
тенденция/I
тесный/AES
типометрия/H
титулованный/ASX
томленный/AS
трахеотомия/I
трезвый/AES
триангуляция/H
тяпка/I
убедительный/AES
убежденный/ASX
убористый/AS
удаленный/ASX
удовлетворенный/ASX
укоренный/AS
укупорка/H
умиленный/ASX
упитанный/ASX
употребительный/AES
упрятанный/AS
урожденный/ASX
утомленный/ASX
утружденный/AS
ухоженный/ASX
ушанка/I
фенилкетонурия/H
фонология/H
фортификация/I
харизма/H
хвастливый/AES
хлопотный/AS
художественный/AX
худышка/I
цветопередача/H
целесообразный/AES
церемонный/AEX
черноголовка/H
четвертина/I
чудовищный/AES
шершавый/AES
шифрованный/ASX
шлейка/I
штамповка/H
эктоплазма/H
электропроводка/I
эмоциональный/AES
энерготехнология/H
явственный/AEX
яснотка/H
